Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 4 Advertisement and Sale of Meat Generally

Cross references.

Authority of Commissioner of Agriculture to impose penalty in lieu of other action, §

2-2-10

.

False advertising generally, §

10-1-420

et seq.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Additional Resolutions Applicable to the Sale of Meat by Weight and Food Service Contracts, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Food Division Regulations, Chapter 40-7-11.

26-2-150.
Legislative intent.

The General Assembly declares that purchasers and consumers have a right to expect and demand honesty and fair practices in the sale of meat for human consumption. It is the purpose of this Code section and Code Sections 26-2-151 through 26-2-154 to ensure that honest, fair, and ethical practices are followed in the advertising and sale of meat for human consumption and to authorize the Commissioner of Agriculture to take all actions necessary to ensure that such practices are followed. The General Assembly views with alarm the fact that misleading and false advertising and sales tactics have been used in the sale of meat to Georgia consumers. It is to stop these practices that the General Assembly has enacted this Code section and Code Sections 26-2-151 through 26-2-154. The consumer has a right to know what he is buying and the true cost of the meat which he is purchasing for consumption.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 1030, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 26.

26-2-151.
Promulgation of rules and regulations regarding deceptive advertising of meat.

The Commissioner of Agriculture is authorized to promulgate and adopt rules and regulations necessary or convenient to carry out Code Section 26-2-150, this Code section, and Code Sections 26-2-152 through 26-2-154 and to prevent the deceptive advertising of meat.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 1030, § 4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 26.

26-2-152.
Advertisement or sale of beef, pork, and lamb; “bait and switch” advertising.

It shall be unlawful for any person, partnership, firm, company, or corporation to advertise, sell, or offer for sale any carcass cuts of beef, pork, or lamb without prominently disclosing the price per pound of such beef, pork, or lamb in all such advertisements or on the packaging or display case in which the meat is displayed or offered for sale. This Code section shall not apply to the sale of beef, pork, or lamb when sold for immediate consumption on the premises or where sold as an unpackaged, cooked food or where sold for purposes other than for human consumption.

It shall be unlawful for any person, partnership, firm, company, or corporation to employ “bait and switch” advertising or sales techniques in connection with the sale of beef, pork, or lamb or to use any other advertising or sales technique which is calculated to deceive, or which in fact deceives, purchasers of beef, pork, or lamb as to what they are purchasing or its quality or quantity. “Bait and switch” as used in this subsection shall mean, but shall not be limited to, the advertising of products with the intent not to sell the products as advertised; or advertising products with the intent not to supply reasonably expected public demand, unless the advertisement discloses a limitation of quantity; or advertising a product which by accepted standards is inferior, with the expectation of switching the consumer to a product of accepted standard at a higher price.

As used in this subsection the term:

“Animal” means any animal, including cattle, swine, sheep, goats, fish, and poultry, including eggs, raised for the production of an edible product or products intended for human consumption. The term also includes “game animals” as such term is defined in Code Section 27-1-2.

“Food” means articles used or processed for human consumption and components of any such articles.

It shall be unlawful for any person, partnership, firm, company, or corporation to label, advertise, or otherwise represent any food produced or sold in this state as meat or any product from an animal unless each product is clearly labeled by displaying the following terms prominently and conspicuously on the front of the package, labeling cell cultured products with “lab-grown,” “lab-created,” or “grown in a lab” and plant based products as “vegetarian,” “veggie,” “vegan,” “plant based,” or other similar term indicating that the product is plant based and does not include the flesh, offal, or other by-product of any part of the carcass of a live animal that has been slaughtered.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 1030, § 2; Ga. L. 2020, p. 303, § 1/SB 211.

The 2020 amendment,

effective December 31, 2020, added subsection (c).

26-2-153.
Sale of partial or whole carcasses.

It shall be unlawful for any person, partnership, firm, company, or corporation to advertise, sell, or offer for sale any quarter, half, three-quarters, or whole animal carcass for use as food for human consumption without disclosing in such advertisement and to the purchaser at the time of sale the minimum number of pounds of retail cuts contained in such quarter, half, three-quarters, or whole animal carcass. In determining the minimum number of pounds of red meat from such carcass, the person, partnership, firm, company, or corporation shall refer to currently effective United States Department of Agriculture charts and tables of yield grades.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 1030, § 3.

26-2-154.
Penalty for violation of Code Sections 26-2-150 through 26-2-153.

Any person, partnership, firm, company, or corporation violating the provisions of Code Sections 26-2-150 through 26-2-153 or any rule or regulation adopted by the Commissioner of Agriculture pursuant to Code Sections 26-2-150 through 26-2-153 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 1030, § 5.

26-2-155.
Food service establishment display of information if serving imported beef.

All food service establishments in this state, as defined in Code Section 26-2-370, which serve carcass beef, or cuts derived from such carcass, imported from a foreign country, shall conspicuously display or attach to their menus the words: “We serve beef imported from a foreign country.”

Any person, firm, or corporation who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 917, §§ 1, 2.

26-2-156.
Slaughter of horses for human consumption or other purposes.

No person, partnership, association, corporation, or firm shall slaughter a horse in this state for the purpose of selling or offering for sale for human consumption or for other than human consumption the horse meat derived from such slaughtered animal unless:

Such horse shall have remained on the business premises for at least four consecutive days prior to its slaughter;

The vehicle license plate number and state of issue of any motor vehicle and any trailer used to transport such horse to the business premises is recorded and retained at such premises;

An identifying description of such horse is maintained at such premises;

The person delivering or selling the horse or horses is identified by his driver’s license number and address and said number is recorded on the bill of sale; and

Satisfactory records, pursuant to rules and regulations of the Department of Agriculture, are kept to show information required in paragraphs (1) through (3) of this subsection.

Any person, partnership, association, corporation, or firm violating this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 846, §§ 1, 3.

Cross references.

Labeling and preparation of carcasses, meat, and meat food products of horses, mules, and other animals, §

26-2-111

.

26-2-157.
Sale of horse meat — Sign; label.

No horse meat shall be sold or offered for sale in this state for human consumption unless at the place of sale there shall be posted in a conspicuous location a sign bearing the words “HORSE MEAT FOR SALE.” No sausage, ground meat, canned, or processed meat containing horse meat shall be sold for human consumption unless the package bears a label stating the proportionate amount of horse meat contained therein and unless there is likewise kept and maintained in a conspicuous place a sign showing that the meat offered for sale contains horse meat.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 475, § 2.

26-2-158.
Sale of horse meat — Seller to inform purchaser.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to sell horse meat in any form for human consumption unless the person, firm, or corporation selling the meat shall inform the purchaser thereof at the time of sale that the purchaser is obtaining horse meat.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 475, § 3.

26-2-159.
Promulgation of regulations.

The Department of Agriculture is authorized to promulgate proper regulations for the carrying out of Code Sections 26-2-157 and 26-2-158, this Code section, and Code Sections 26-2-160 and 26-2-161 and to assist prosecuting attorneys in the enforcement thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 475, § 4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 26.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2003, inserted “Code Sections” preceding “26-2-157 and 26-2-158” near the middle of this Code section.

26-2-160.
Sale of dog meat for human consumption; label on packages.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to distribute or offer for sale for human consumption any dog meat in the State of Georgia; and all dog meat sold in this state for any purpose, other than human consumption, shall be sold in packages only. The packages shall carry a label showing the contents, for what use it is intended, and stating that said contents are “NOT FOR HUMAN CONSUMPTION.” The words “not for human consumption” shall be in conspicuous type.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 475, § 1.

26-2-161.
Penalty for violations of Code Section 26-2-157, 26-2-158, 26-2-159, or 26-2-160.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating the terms of Code Section 26-2-157, 26-2-158, 26-2-159, or 26-2-160 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof shall be fined an amount not exceeding $1,000.00 or imprisoned for a period not exceeding 12 months, or both, at the discretion of the court.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 475, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 26.